Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-220.03
State and county fairs; carnival companies, booking agencies, and shows; security; failure to execute and file; violation; penalty.

Each officer, owner, or manager of any carnival company, booking agency, or show who willfully fails to cause cash, certified check, or bond to be executed and filed as required by section 2-220.01, or who willfully fails to cause the receipt or certificate to be filed as provided by section 2-220.01, shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1949, c. 3, § 3, p. 60;

Laws 1951, c. 5, § 3, p. 68;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 4.